src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/es-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Spanish, Grade 2 table
#
# -----------
#-index-name: Spanish, contracted
#-display-name: Spanish contracted braille
#
#+language:es
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
# Marked as "direction:forward" by Bue Vester-Andersen
# as tests only run forward.
#+direction:forward
# -----------
#
#  Based on the Linux screenreader BRLTTY, copyright (C) 1999-2006 by
#  The BRLTTY Team
#
#  Copyright (C) 2018 Juan Pablo Bello
#
#  Other contributors: Carlos Monge (providing sources), Bert Frees (aid in table development)
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#  Remarks: this table is largely based following the conventions as set in the ONCE
#  international manual for contracted (abbreviated) Spanish grade 2 stenography manual
#  published in 1998, by Mª del Carmen Galíndez González, available at
#  https://www.foal.es/es/biblioteca/curso-de-estenograf%C3%AD. The official Spanish
#  dictionary (RAE 23rd edition, 2017 update) was used for the check up of several things,
#  including contraction combinations, to check whether words existed in the language and
#  so on. Found at http://dle.rae.es/. Revised accentuation rules are also in effect,
#  especially those that deal with pronouns. This is important to mention as it is likely
#  to confuse many people due to the recent revision and many still have misconceptions
#  about pronouns. In a nutshell the accent for all demonstrative pronouns is now obsolete
#  in the Spanish language, see:
#  http://www.rae.es/consultas/el-adverbio-solo-y-los-pronombres-demostrativos-sin-tilde. A
#  few other secondary sources as well as answers to numerous questions to skilled braille
#  readers in different blindness braille Spanish social media groups have also been used
#  for completeness. The listed reference is the latest dated one which had no conflicts
#  or inconsistencies that could be found. For example, another unpublished online
#  reference dated 2006 did exist in Colombia, however the entire text was already in
#  grade 2 form, rendering it rather useless. It's important to note that this table is
#  provided as a convenience only since there are currently (present year 2018) no
#  official editorials or organizations which offer Spanish grade 2 texts or
#  books. However, the original creator feels that abreviated forms of reading and writing
#  are a key asset in any language, if not at least for personal use. Due that there are
#  some officially published sources in Spanish grade 2 it would be a shame to let all of
#  those world concerted efforts disappear and never make its way into modern times or
#  technology. Even though commercially renowned packages like Duxbury do support
#  abbreviated Spanish, various tests and readers have found it outdated and not always
#  corrrectly implemented even as of version 12.3 in present year 2018. Open sourcing the
#  grade 2 code will hopefully prevent this from happening and will keep braille moving
#  forward. Usual disclaimer: of course, everyone who rigorously tested the table and
#  improved its opcodes, etc. has done their best so that rules and signs are represented
#  clearly and accurately, but cannot accept any responsibility for any errors or problems
#  the user may encounter in applying it to his or her work. So reporting of any of those
#  is always encouraged.
#
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------

# Add virtual dot to k, w and x (see below). This overwrites the definitions from
# es-g1.ctb. For the table to work these rules need to be defined before AND after the
# include.
lowercase k 13b
lowercase w 2456b
lowercase x 1346b

include es-g1.ctb

# braille indicators specific to Spanish Grade 2

# grade 2 interruptor and also accentuation indicator

multind 56 letsign capsletter 

# emphasis start and end

emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold

begemph bold 5-35
endemph bold 5-35
begemph italic 5-35
endemph italic 5-35

# Spanish grade 2 situations solved with the use of multi-pass implementations

# If a word happens to be made up of only lowered signs, then first contraction is not
# contracted to avoid confussion with punctuation. A multi-pass implementation is in order
# here. In a first pass all the contractions are made, but with a temporary virtual dot;
# then in a second pass some contractions are cancelled, and for the other contractions the
# virtual dot is removed.

# Adding the virtual dot to lowered cell contractions.

sign \xe001 2a
sign \xe002 23a
sign \xe003 25a
sign \xe004 256a
sign \xe005 26a
sign \xe009 35a
sign \xe008 236a
sign \xe007 2356a
sign \xe006 235a
sign \xe000 356a

# Forcing the contractions to have the virtual dot.

begmidword ab 2a
always br 23a
always cr 25a
always dr 256a
always en 26a
always in 35a
always er 236a
always gr 2356a
always pr 235a
always tr 356a

# Grouping all of these into a class.

attribute contraction \xe000\xe001\xe002\xe003\xe004\xe005\xe006\xe007\xe008\xe009
swapdd cancelcontraction 2a,23a,25a,256a,26a,35a,236a,2356a,235a,356a 1-12,12-1235,14-1235,145-1235,15-1345,24-1345,15-1235,1245-1235,1234-1235,2345-1235
swapdd finalizecontraction 2a,23a,25a,256a,26a,35a,236a,2356a,235a,356a 2,23,25,256,26,35,236,2356,235,356

#  contraction cancellations using variables

noback pass2 $s[%contraction]$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 $s[%contraction]%contraction.$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 $s[%contraction]~ %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 $s[%contraction]%contraction.~ %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `[%contraction]$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `[%contraction]%contraction.$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `[%contraction]~ %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `[%contraction]%contraction.~ %cancelcontraction
# same with leading capsign
noback pass2 $s@46[%contraction]$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 $s@46[%contraction]$wx.$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 $s@46[%contraction]~ %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 $s@46[%contraction]$wx.~ %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `@46[%contraction]$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `@46[%contraction]$wx.$s %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `@46[%contraction]~ %cancelcontraction
noback pass2 `@46[%contraction]$wx.~ %cancelcontraction

noback pass2 %contraction %finalizecontraction

# Whenever x, w or k is anywhere in a word the entire word is uncontracted and dot 5 prefixes the word.

# Translate words containing k, w or x according to character definitions.

nocont K
nocont W
nocont X
nocont k
nocont w
nocont x

# To prefix the words with dot 5 we use a multi-pass implementation. First we add a virtual
# dot to k, w and x so that they can be distinguished in pass2.
lowercase k 13b
lowercase w 2456b
lowercase x 1346b

# Then we define a class and a swap set. The class is needed to make the negations work.
# (does not work with only the swapdd rule: is this a bug?)
attribute kwx kwx # this is the 2nd class defined in this table, so we can also use $x instead of %kwx
# The swap set is needed for the rule that removes the virtual dots.
swapdd kwx 13b,2456b,1346b 13,2456,1346
# We are using the same name for both because we can.

# In a first pass we add the dot 5.
noback pass2 _$s[%kwx] @5*
noback pass2 _$s[!$xs.%kwx] @5* # !$xs means "anything but a K, W, X or SPACE"
noback pass2 `[%kwx] @5*
noback pass2 `[!$xs.%kwx] @5*

# In a second pass we remove the virtual dots.
noback pass3 %kwx %kwx

# Special omnipresent mandatory rules for dot 5 to avoid punctuation ending
# ambiguity. Closing quotation, question marks, or both.

endword ?" 5-26-236
endword " 5-236
endword ? 5-26

# single cell word contractions, single letters

word bien 12
word con 14
word de 145
word el 15
word fue 124
word gran 1245
word haber 125
word si 24
word jamás 245
word al 13
word le 123
word me 134
word no 1345
word año 12456
word por 1234
word que 12345
word ser 1235
word se 234
word te 2345
word un 136
word vez 1236
word como 2456
word son 1346
word este 1356

# single cell contractions based on signs and accented letters

word las 12346
word ella 123456
word mas 134-12346
word él 2346
word según 23456
word para 16
word siempre 126
word ante 146
word cada 1456
word muy 156
word es 1246
word pues 1256
word los 246
word sobre 23
word del 256
word en 26
word pero 235
word grado 2356
word hace 236
word sin 35
word entre 356
word la 3
word lo 36
word número 3456
word sí 34
word aquel 346
word su 345

# common derivative plurals and endings based on these contractions

# pronouns first

word estos 1356-246
word estas 1356-12346
word eso 1246-135
word esa 1246-1
word esos 1246-246
word ésas 1246-12346
word aquello 346-135
word aquella 346-1
word aquellas 346-12346
word aquellos 346-246

# two sign words

word bienes 12-1246
word ello 123456-135
word ellas 123456-12346
word ellos 123456-246
word una 136-1
word uno 136-135
word unos 136-246
word unas 136-12346
word ese 1246-15
word años 12456-246
word grados 2356-246
word números 3456-246
word seres 234-1246
word sones 1346-1246
word hacer 236-1235
word hacen 236-1345
word hacemos 236-134-246

# dot 5 as stenographic accentuator for a few of those words

word qué 5-12345
word sé 5-234
word cómo 5-2456
word más 12356
word e 5-15
word u 5-136

# abbreviations consisting of two or more signs

#  letter a
word absoluto 1-12
word acaso 1-14
word acerca 1-14-14
word apenas 1-1234
word aunque 1-136
word atrás 1-356
# acción is added at the word endings

# letter b

word buena 12-1
word bajo 12-245
word buenamente 12-134
word buen 12-1345
word bueno 12-135
word bastante 12-2345
sufword bondad 12-1456

# letter c

contraction cc

# this specific word has potential back translation problems
sufword cerca 14-14
contraction cd
word cuando 14-145
word ciego 14-1245
word cual 14-123
word cualquier 14-12345
word cualquiera 14-12345-1
word casi 14-234
word cierto 14-2345
word cuanto 14-136
word cuyo 14-13456

# letter d

word debajo 145-12-245
contraction dc
sufword decía 145-14
prfword decían 145-14-1345
word donde 145-145
word dondequiera 145-145-12345
contraction df
sufword difícil 145-124
prfword diferencia 145-124-14
prfword diferente 145-124-2345
prfword dijo 145-245
word delante 145-123
prfword demás 145-134
word demasiado 145-134-145
word después 145-1234
word desde 145-234
word durante 145-136
word detrás 145-356

# letter e

word efecto 15-124
word efectivo 15-124-1236
sufword efectividad 15-124-1236-1456
word ejemplo 15-245
sufword ejemplar 15-245-1235

# letter f

sufword favor 124-1236
sufword fácil 124-12356
sufword facilidad 124-1456

# letter g

# this specific word conflicts with back translation but many words in the language can contract it
noback always grande 1245-145
sufword general 1245-1345
sufword generalidad 1245-1345-1456

# letter h

word había 125-12
contraction hbd
word habido 125-12-145
word habían 125-12-1345
word hacia 125-14
word hijo 125-245
contraction hm
word hermano 125-134
word hasta 125-234
contraction ht
word historia 125-2345
word haya 125-13456
word hayan 125-13456-1345
word hombre 125-2456

# letter i

sufword igual 24-1245
sufword igualdad 24-1245-1456

# leter j

word junto 245-2345
word joven 245-1236
sufword juventud 245-1236-2345

# letter k

contraction kg
word algo 13-1245
word alguien 13-1245-1345
word algún 13-1345
word alguna 13-1345-1
word alguno 13-1345-135
sufword alrededor 13-1235

# letter l
